test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-harinwma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - harinõma: # Verb (66+67) harinõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     harinõma+V+Inf/mA: harinõma
     harinõma+V+Inf: [harinõdaq, haridaq]
     harinõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: harinuq
     harinõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [harinõt, harit]

     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: harinõ
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [harinõt, harinõdõq]
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: harinõs
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: harinõmiq
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [harinõtiq, harinõdõq]
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: harinõsõq
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: harinõ
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: harisi
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [harisit, harisidõq]
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: harisi
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: harisimiq
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [harisitiq, harisidõq]
     harinõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [harisiq, harisivaq]

     harinõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: harinõdas

     harinõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: harinõv

     harinõma+V+Jus: harinõguq
